Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-314
Mayor and chief of police; citizen aid in law enforcement; powers.

The mayor and chief of police of a city of the primary class shall each have the power to call upon any citizen to aid in the enforcement of any ordinance or suppression of any riot, and any person who shall refuse or neglect to obey such call shall forfeit and pay a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars. Such power shall not be construed to include the appointment of special police or special deputies.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 28, p. 79;

R.S.1913, § 4491;

C.S.1922, § 3877;

C.S.1929, § 15-314;

R.S.1943, § 15-314;

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 91.
November 14, 2020